Missouri, session 2026, HB2118.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 326.271, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 326.271, to read as follows:
326.271. 1. The board shall promulgate rules of procedure for governing the conduct
of matters before the board.
2. The board shall promulgate rules of professional conduct for establishing and
maintaining high standards of competence and integrity in the profession of public
accounting.
3. In promulgating rules and regulations regarding the requirements of continuing
education, the board:
(1) May use and rely upon guidelines and pronouncements of recognized educational
and professional associations;
(2) May prescribe for content, duration and organization of courses;
(3) Shall consider applicant accessibility to continuing education as required by the
board, and any impediments to the interstate practice of public accounting which may result
from differences in requirements in states;
(4) May in its discretion relax or suspend continuing education requirements for
instances of individual hardship;
(5) Shall not require the completion of more than one hundred twenty hours of
continuing education or its equivalent in any three-year period, not more than one-third of
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2118 2
which shall be required in any one year. The continuing education requirements must be
capable of being fulfilled in programs or courses reasonably available to licensees within the
state.
4. The board may require by rule licensees to submit any continuing education
reporting as the board deems necessary.
5. A certified public accountant shall be exempt from any continuing education
requirements for any year that the certified public accountant is actively serving in the
general assembly.
6. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this chapter shall become effective only if it complies
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028.
This chapter and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2001, shall be invalid
and void.
✔